Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5558.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "earned wage access services act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Applicant" means a person that applies for licensure under this act. (b) "Consumer" means an individual who resides in this state. (c) "Consumer-directed wage access services" means offering or providing to a consumer access to the consumer's earned but unpaid income based on the consumer's representations of, and a licensee's reasonable determination of, the consumer's earned but unpaid income. (d) "Department" means the department of insurance and financial services. (e) "Depository financial institution" means any of the following institutions whose deposits are insured by an agency of the federal government: (i) A bank. (ii) A savings and loan association. (iii) A savings bank. (iv) A credit union. (f) "Director" means the director of the department. (g) "Earned but unpaid income" means salary, wages, compensation, or other income that a consumer or employer has represented as, and a licensee has reasonably determined to have been, earned or accrued to the benefit of the consumer in exchange for the consumer's provision of services to the consumer's employer or on behalf of the consumer's employer, and that have not been paid to the consumer by the consumer's employer at the time that the licensee pays the proceeds to the consumer. Earned but unpaid income includes, but is not limited to, both of the following: (i) Salary, wages, compensation, or other income that is earned on an hourly, project-based, piecework, or other basis. (ii) Salary, wages, compensation, or other income that is earned through services rendered as an independent contractor. (h) "Earned wage access services" means offering or providing consumer-directed wage access services or employer-integrated wage access services, or both. (i) "Employer" means a person that employs a consumer and that is contractually obligated to pay the consumer earned but unpaid income in exchange for the consumer's provision of services to the employer or on behalf of the employer, including on an hourly basis, project-based basis, piecework basis, or other basis, or as an independent contractor. Employer does not include either of the following: (i) A customer of an employer. (ii) A person that has an obligation to pay a salary, wages, compensation, or other income to a consumer that is not based on the consumer's provision of services for or on behalf of the person. (j) "Employer-integrated wage access services" means offering or providing to a consumer access to the consumer's earned but unpaid income based on the employment, income, or attendance data obtained directly or indirectly from the consumer's employer, including, but not limited to, the employer's payroll service provider. (k) "Executive officer" means the chief executive officer of a licensee, president of a licensee, vice president of a licensee, chief financial officer of a licensee, compliance officer of a licensee, other officer of a licensee, controller of a licensee, partner of a licensee, member of a licensee, or other similarly situated person. (l) "Fee" does not include a tip, gratuity, or donation, but means both of the following: (i) An amount of money imposed by a licensee for delivery or expedited delivery of proceeds to a consumer. (ii) An amount of money associated with a subscription or membership imposed by a licensee for a bona fide group of services that include earned wage access services. (m) "Licensee" means a person that is licensed under this act. (n) "Outstanding proceeds" means proceeds remitted to a consumer by a licensee that have not yet been repaid to the licensee. (o) "Person" means an individual or a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. (p) "Preauthorized electronic fund transfer" means that term as defined in 12 CFR 1005.2. (q) "Proceeds" means a payment to a consumer by a licensee that is based on earned but unpaid income. (r) "Rule" means a rule promulgated under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. Sec. 5. (1) A person shall not engage in the business of earned wage access services without a license under this act. (2) This act does not apply to any of the following: (a) A depository financial institution. (b) A service provider, such as a payroll service provider, that, in the course of conducting business, may verify a consumer's available earnings but is not contractually obligated to fund proceeds delivered as part of earned wage access services. (c) An employer that offers a portion of its employee's or independent contractor's salary, wages, or compensation to its employee or independent contractor before the normally scheduled payday. (d) A person that offers or provides earned wage access services and reports a consumer's payment or nonpayment of outstanding proceeds, fees, tips, gratuities, or donations solely attributable to the earned wage services to a consumer reporting agency, as defined in section 603 of the fair credit reporting act, 15 USC 1681a. Sec. 7. (1) To obtain a license to engage in the business of earned wage access services, an applicant shall submit an application for a license to the department, on a form prescribed by the director, in writing and signed under penalty of perjury that contains all of the following: (a) The name, street address, and telephone number of the applicant's locations in this state from which the applicant will offer earned wage access services, or a statement that the applicant will offer earned wage access services in this state exclusively online, as applicable. (b) The name, residential address, business address, and telephone number of the applicant, each executive officer of the applicant, and each person that owns or controls, directly or indirectly, 10% or more of an ownership interest in the applicant. (c) Other information the department considers necessary. (2) If an applicant has more than 1 physical location in this state from which the applicant intends to provide earned wage access services, a separate license is required for each location. Sec. 9. (1) A person shall pay a license fee, as established by the director under subsection (2), not later than 60 days after the person submits an application for a license to engage in the business of earned wage access services to the department and then annually. (2) Each year, the director shall create a license fee schedule based on each licensee's volume of business, number of locations, and other factors the director considers reasonable to generate funds sufficient to pay, but not exceed, the department's reasonably anticipated costs of administering this act. (3) A licensee shall pay the actual costs of travel, lodging, and meals incurred by a department employee who travels to another state to investigate the licensee. A department employee who travels under this subsection shall comply with the latest standardized travel and reimbursement regulations established by the department of technology, management, and budget for classified state employees. (4) In addition to the license fee under subsection (1), except as provided in this subsection, a person shall provide a $50,000.00 surety bond issued by a bonding company or insurance company authorized to conduct business in this state, on a form prescribed by the director, to secure the performance of the person's obligations under this act. If 1 person owns 20% or more of an ownership interest in 2 or more licensees, the person need only collectively provide 1 $50,000.00 surety bond. Sec. 11. Money received under this act must be deposited in an interest bearing account in the state treasury and credited to the department to be used only for the expenses of the department in administering this act. Sec. 13. (1) On receipt of a complete application for a license to engage in the business of earned wage access services, the director shall determine whether the applicant satisfies the requirements of this act. If the director finds the applicant satisfies the requirements of this act, the director shall issue a license to the applicant. (2) A licensee shall post a copy of its license to engage in the business of earned wage access services under this act in a conspicuous location at its place of business or, if the licensee offers earned wage access services in this state exclusively online, make a copy of its license available on its website. Sec. 15. (1) If the director finds that an applicant does not satisfy the requirements of this act, the director shall notify the applicant in writing that the applicant's application for a license to engage in the business of earned wage access services is denied and explain the director's basis for denying the applicant a license. (2) If the director denies an applicant a license to engage in the business of earned wage access services under this act or if the director fails to make a determination not later than 60 days after the receipt of a complete application, or after a longer time period agreed to by the director and the applicant, the applicant may submit a written demand to the director for a hearing before the director on the question of the applicant's licensure. The director shall hold a hearing, reconsider the applicant's application, and, after the hearing, issue a written order granting or denying the applicant a license. Sec. 17. (1) A license to engage in the business of earned wage access services is not transferable or assignable. (2) If a licensee undergoes a change in control, the director may conduct an investigation to determine whether the licensee can operate under an existing license to engage in the business of earned wage access services or must file a new application. The licensee shall pay the costs incurred by the director's investigation. The director's written approval is required to continue the licensee's operation under an existing license. (3) A licensee shall do all of the following if it offers earned wage access services at 1 or more locations in this state: (a) Not less than 15 days before offering earned wage access services at a new location, on a form prescribed by the director, provide written notice to the director of the name, street address, and telephone number of the new location. (b) Not less than 15 days before discontinuing earned wage access services at an existing location, on a form prescribed by the director, provide written notice to the director of the name, street address, and telephone number of the existing location. (4) A licensee shall comply with the director's request for information or documentation under this act and any reasonable written deadlines the director imposes on the request. (5) As used in this section, "control" means 1 of the following: (a) For a corporation, direct or indirect ownership of, or the right to control, 10% or more of the voting shares of a corporation or the ability of a person to elect a majority of the directors of the corporation or otherwise effect a change in policy. (b) For an entity other than a corporation, the ability to change the principals of the organization, whether active or passive. Sec. 19. The director may identify by rule events that require the submission of a written report from a licensee to the director. The written report, on a form prescribed by the director, must describe the event and its expected impact on the licensee's activities. Sec. 21. A license to engage in the business of earned wage access services expires on September 30 of each year. A licensee may renew a license for a 12-month period by submitting to the director, on a form prescribed by the director, a complete renewal application under section 9 demonstrating compliance with this act and the license renewal fee. A licensee shall submit a renewal application on or before August 1 of each year and the director shall proceed in the manner described in sections 7 and 13. Sec. 23. (1) The director may promulgate rules that the director considers necessary to administer and enforce this act. The director shall make available to each licensee a copy of any rule the director promulgates within a reasonable time frame after issuance. (2) If information that a licensee previously submitted to the director under this act is no longer accurate, the licensee shall promptly submit a correction in writing to the director. (3) To ensure compliance with this act, the director may examine a licensee's earned wage access services books, accounts, and records. Sec. 25. The director shall require a licensee to retain books, accounts, or records under this act. Unless federal law or a law of this state concerning record retention requires longer retention, a licensee shall retain the designated books, accounts, and records for not less than 3 years. Sec. 27. Each year, the director shall select a date by which a licensee shall submit a written report regarding its earned wage access services to the director containing all of the following information: (a) The gross revenue attributable to the licensee's earned wage access services. (b) The total number of transactions in which the licensee provided proceeds to consumers. (c) The total number of unique consumers to whom the licensee provided proceeds. (d) The total dollar amount of proceeds the licensee provided to consumers. (e) The total dollar amount of fees, tips, gratuities, or donations that the licensee received from consumers. (f) Other information the director considers necessary. Sec. 29. (1) A licensee shall do all of the following: (a) Develop and implement policies and procedures to respond to questions raised by a consumer and address complaints from a consumer in an expedited manner. (b) Before entering into an agreement with a consumer for earned wage access services, do both of the following: (i) Inform the consumer of the consumer's rights under the agreement. (ii) Fully and clearly disclose all fees associated with the licensee's earned wage access services. (c) Inform a consumer of any material changes to the terms and conditions of the earned wage access services before implementing those changes for the consumer. (d) Allow a consumer to cancel, at any time and without incurring a fee, the consumer's participation in an agreement for earned wage access services. (e) Comply with all local, state, and federal privacy and information security laws. (f) If the licensee offers a consumer the option to receive proceeds for a fee or solicits a tip, gratuity, or donation, offer the consumer at least 1 alternative option allowing the consumer to obtain proceeds at no cost and explain to the consumer how to elect the no-cost option. (g) Provide proceeds to a consumer by any means mutually agreed on by the consumer and the licensee. (h) If the licensee solicits, charges, or receives a tip, gratuity, or donation from a consumer, do both of the following: (i) Clearly and conspicuously disclose to the consumer immediately before each transaction that a tip, gratuity, or donation amount may be zero and is voluntary. (ii) Clearly and conspicuously disclose in the licensee's service contract with the consumer and elsewhere that tips, gratuities, or donations are voluntary and that the offering of earned wage access services, including the amount of proceeds that a consumer is eligible to request and the frequency with which proceeds are provided to a consumer, is not contingent on whether the consumer pays a tip, gratuity, or donation, or on the size of the tip, gratuity, or donation. (i) If a licensee seeks payment of outstanding proceeds, fees, or other payments, including, but not limited to, tips, gratuities, or donations from a consumer's account at a depository financial institution, including through a preauthorized electronic fund transfer, do both of the following: (i) Comply with the applicable provisions of the electronic fund transfer act, 15 USC 1693 to 1693r. (ii) Reimburse the consumer for the full amount of an overdraft or nonsufficient funds fee imposed on a consumer by the consumer's depository financial institution that was caused by the licensee attempting to seek payment of outstanding proceeds, fees, or other payments, including, but not limited to, tips, gratuities, or donations on a date before, or in an incorrect amount from, the date or amount disclosed to the consumer. (2) Subsection (1)(i) does not apply to payments of outstanding amounts or fees incurred by a consumer through fraudulent or other unlawful means. (3) A licensee may use the mailing address or state of residence provided by a consumer or a consumer's employer to determine the consumer's state of residence under this act. Sec. 31. A licensee shall not do any of the following: (a) Share with an employer any fees, tips, gratuities, or donations that were received from or charged to a consumer for earned wage access services. (b) Use a consumer's credit score from the consumer's credit report to determine the consumer's eligibility for earned wage access services. (c) Charge a late fee, deferral fee, interest, or any other penalty or charge for failure to pay outstanding proceeds, fees, tips, gratuities, or donations. (d) Compel or attempt to compel a consumer's payment of outstanding proceeds, fees, tips, gratuities, or donations to the licensee through any of the following means: (i) A civil action against the consumer in court. (ii) The use of a third party to pursue collection from the consumer on the licensee's behalf. (iii) The sale or assignment of outstanding amounts to a third-party collector or debt buyer for collection from the consumer. (e) Accept payments of outstanding proceeds, fees, tips, gratuities, or donations from a consumer by means of a credit card or charge card. (f) Impose a fee in excess of $7.00 in connection with a fee described in section 3(l)(i). (g) If the licensee solicits, charges, or receives tips, gratuities, or donations from a consumer, mislead or deceive the consumer about the voluntary nature of the tips, gratuities, or donations or represent that the tips, gratuities, or donations will benefit specific individuals or groups of individuals. (h) Cause a probability of confusion or misunderstanding as to the legal rights, obligations, or remedies of a consumer who is participating in a transaction for earned wage access services. Sec. 33. (1) A consumer may file a written complaint regarding a licensee's alleged violation of this act with the department on a form prescribed by the director. The consumer shall submit all supporting evidence along with the complaint to the director. The director shall investigate a complaint filed by a consumer under this subsection. (2) The director may investigate or examine a licensee and conduct hearings to determine whether a licensee violated this act or conducted business in a manner justifying suspension or revocation of its license to engage in the business of earned wage access services in this state. (3) The director may subpoena witnesses and documents, papers, books, records, and other evidence within the director's jurisdiction under this act. The director may also administer oaths to testifying witnesses. If a person fails to comply with a subpoena issued by the director or refuses to testify regarding matters about which the person may be lawfully questioned, the director may petition the circuit court of the county in which the person resides or has its principal place of business for an order requiring the person to comply or testify. Sec. 35. (1) If the director is of the opinion that a licensee has or is about to engage in a practice that poses a threat of financial loss or threat to the public welfare, or violates this act, a federal law, a law of this state, a rule, or a regulation, the director may serve on the licensee a notice of intention to issue a cease and desist order. A notice that the director serves under this section must contain a statement of facts explaining the licensee's alleged violation and the date and time of the hearing at which the director will determine whether to issue a cease and desist order against the licensee. (2) A licensee that fails to appear at a hearing under subsection (1) consents to the director's issuance of a cease and desist order. The director may issue and serve a cease and desist order on a licensee if the licensee consents to a cease and desist order or the director finds at the hearing under subsection (1) that the licensee committed the violation alleged in the notice of intention to issue a cease and desist order. The cease and desist order may require the licensee and its executive officers, employees, and agents to cease and desist specified practices and take corrective action. (3) A cease and desist order is effective on the date of service except to the extent that the director or a court stays, modifies, terminates, or sets aside the cease and desist order. A cease and desist order issued with the consent of the licensee is effective at the time specified in the cease and desist order and remains effective and enforceable as provided in the cease and desist order. Sec. 37. (1) The director may, after notice and a hearing under subsections (3) and (4), suspend or revoke a licensee's license if the director finds a licensee responsible for any of the following: (a) Failing to pay the annual license fee imposed by the director under this act. (b) Engaging in dishonest activities, including, but not limited to, committing fraud or making a misrepresentation. (c) Violating this act, including a rule promulgated under this act, while conducting business as a licensee. (d) Making a false statement in an application under this act. (e) Demonstrating incompetency or untrustworthiness. (f) Engaging in a pattern or practice that poses a threat of financial loss or threat to the public welfare. (2) If the director suspends or revokes a licensee's license at 1 location for a reason applicable to the licensee's other locations, the director may suspend or revoke all of the licensee's licenses under this act. (3) The director shall serve on the licensee a notice of intention to issue a revocation or suspension order. A notice that the director serves under this section must contain a statement of facts explaining the licensee's alleged violation and the date and time of the hearing at which the director will determine whether to suspend or revoke a licensee's license. (4) A licensee that fails to appear at a hearing under subsection (3) consents to the director's issuance of a suspension or revocation order. The director may issue and serve a suspension or revocation order on a licensee if the licensee consents to a suspension or revocation order or the director finds at the hearing under subsection (3) that the licensee committed the violation alleged in the notice of intention to issue a suspension or revocation order. (5) A suspension or revocation order is effective on the date of service except to the extent that the director or a court stays, modifies, terminates, or sets aside the suspension or revocation order. A suspension or revocation order issued with the consent of the licensee is effective at the time specified in the suspension or revocation order and remains effective and enforceable as provided in the suspension or revocation order. Sec. 39. If the director finds that a licensee violated this act, the director may order the person to pay an administrative fine of not less than $1,000.00 or more than $10,000.00 for each violation. The director may order a person that violates this act to pay for the costs of the department's investigation. An administrative fine collected under this section must be deposited in the interest bearing account in the state treasury under section 11. Sec. 40. A person that violates this act is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000.00. Sec. 41. (1) If the director is of the opinion that a person has engaged in fraud, the director may serve on the person a notice of intention to issue an order prohibiting that person from serving as an employee, agent, or executive officer of a licensee. A notice issued under this subsection must contain a statement of facts explaining the person's alleged fraud and the date and time of a hearing at which the director will determine whether to issue an order prohibiting that person from serving as an employee, agent, or executive officer of a licensee. The director shall set the hearing not later than 60 days after the date of the notice issued under this subsection. (2) A person that fails to appear at the hearing under subsection (1) consents to the director's issuance of an order prohibiting that person from serving as an employee, agent, or executive officer of a licensee. The director may issue and serve an order prohibiting that person from serving as an employee, agent, or executive officer of a licensee if the person consents or the director finds at the hearing under subsection (1) that the person committed the fraud alleged in the notice of intention to issue an order prohibiting that person from serving as an employee, agent, or executive officer of a licensee. (3) An order prohibiting a person from serving as an employee, agent, or executive officer of a licensee is effective on the date of service except to the extent that the director or a court stays, modifies, terminates, or sets aside the order. An order prohibiting a person from serving as an employee, agent, or executive officer of a licensee issued with the consent of the person is effective at the time specified in the order and remains effective and enforceable as provided in the order. The director shall serve a copy of an order prohibiting a person from serving as an employee, agent, or executive officer of a licensee on the licensee of which the person is an employee, agent, or executive officer. (4) Five years from the date the director issued an order prohibiting a person from serving as an employee, agent, or executive officer of a licensee, the person subject to the order may request that the director terminate the order. (5) If the director determines that a person that received a notice of intention to issue an order prohibiting a person from serving as an employee, agent, or executive officer of a licensee poses a threat of financial loss to a licensee's consumers, the director may serve the person an order suspending the person from serving as an employee, agent, or executive officer of a licensee. An order suspending a person from serving as an employee, agent, or executive officer of a licensee is effective on the date of service except to the extent that the director or a court stays, modifies, terminates, or sets aside the order. The suspension remains in effect until the director dismisses the charges on which the order is based. (6) Unless otherwise agreed to by the director and a person subject to an order suspending the person from serving as an employee, agent, or executive officer of a licensee, the director shall hold the hearing required under subsection (1) to review the suspension not earlier than 5 days before, or later than 20 days after, the date of the notice of intention to issue an order prohibiting a person from serving as an employee, agent, or executive officer of a licensee. (7) If a person is convicted of a felony involving fraud, dishonesty, or breach of trust, the director may issue an order suspending or prohibiting that person from being a licensee and from serving as an employee, agent, or executive officer of a licensee. Five years after the date of an order under this subsection, the person subject to the order may request that the director terminate the order. (8) The director shall mail a copy of a notice or order issued under this section to the licensee of which the person is an employee, agent, or executive officer. (9) Not later than 30 days after the director notifies the parties that a case was submitted to the director for a final decision, the director shall render a decision that includes a statement of facts sufficient to establish the director's decision and serve a copy of the decision and an order consistent with the decision. (10) Except for a consent order, a party to a proceeding under this section or a person affected by an order that the director issues under this section may obtain judicial review of the order. A consent order may be reviewed under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. Except for an order under judicial review, the director may terminate or set aside any order. The director may terminate or set aside an order under judicial review with the permission of the court reviewing the order. (11) Unless ordered by a court, the commencement of judicial review proceedings under subsection (10) does not stay a director's order. (12) The director may petition the circuit court of the county in which the subject of the order resides or has its principal place of business for the enforcement of an outstanding order that the director issued under this section. (13) A person that violates a final order that the director issues under this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year, a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. (14) An executive officer subject to an order that the director issues under this section and who meets all of the following requirements is not in violation of the director's order: (a) The executive officer does not directly or indirectly control or participate in the control of a licensee after the date of an order issued by the director. (b) The executive officer transfers the executive officer's ownership interests in the licensee to an unrelated third party not later than 6 months after the date the director issues the final order. (15) As used in this section, "fraud" means actionable fraud, actual fraud, constructive fraud, criminal fraud, extrinsic fraud, intrinsic fraud, fraud in the execution, fraud in the inducement, fraud in fact, fraud in law, or any other form of fraud. Sec. 43. (1) A licensee subject to a cease and desist order, a suspension or revocation order, or subject to a fine under this act is entitled to a hearing before the director if the licensee files a written request for a hearing with the director not later than 30 days after the effective date of the order. (2) All administrative proceedings under this act are subject to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. Sec. 44. A person that provides earned wage access services in this state as of January 1, 2025 may continue to do so after the effective date of this act if that person does both of the following: (a) Applies for a license under this act not later than 6 months after the date the department makes available an application for a license. (b) Complies with the requirements of this act until the department grants or denies the person's application for a license under this act.